Utah statutes.
10-3-201.   Municipal general election -- Terms of office.

(1)  Consistent with Section 20A-1-202, on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November in odd-numbered years, a municipal general election shall be held in all municipalities to fill all elective offices vacated by 12 o'clock noon on the first Monday in the January following the election. The officers elected shall continue in the office to which they were elected for four years except in case of death, resignation, removal or disqualification from office.

(2)  The officers so elected shall begin their term of office at 12 o'clock noon on the first Monday in January following their election.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2007 General Session

